src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! # Bokmål conjunctions

!! This file documents the Bokmål conjunctions stem file [stems/conjunctions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc).


LEXICON conj
!! @LEXNAME@ for the tag +CC
 +CC: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
!! @LEXNAME@  både, og, ..
både conj ;
og conj ;
og adv ;
enten conj ;
eller conj ;
samt conj ;
men conj ;
verken conj ;
verken+Err/Orth:hverken conj ;
dog conj ; 
endog conj ; 
